District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-325.271

Surplus Personal Property Sales Fund.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1062, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1013, 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 1062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 1062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 1062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 1013 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).